Utah statutes.
62A-4a-1002.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), "severe type of child abuse
or neglect" means:
(i)  if committed by a person 18 years of age or older:
(A) chronic abuse;
(B)  severe abuse;
(C)  sexual abuse;
(D)  sexual exploitation;
(E)  abandonment;
(F)  chronic neglect; or
(G)  severe neglect; or
(ii)  if committed by a person under the age of 18:
(A)  serious physical injury, as defined in Subsection 76-5-109(1), to another
child which indicates a significant risk to other children; or
(B)  sexual behavior with or upon another child which indicates a significant
risk to other children.
(b)  "Severe type of child abuse or neglect" does not include:
(i)  the use of reasonable and necessary physical restraint or force by an
educator in accordance with Subsection 53A-11-802(2) or Section 76-2-401;
(ii)  a person's conduct that:
(A)  is justified under Section 76-2-401; or
(B)  constitutes the use of reasonable and necessary physical restraint or
force in self-defense or otherwise appropriate to the circumstances to obtain
possession of a weapon or other dangerous object in the possession or under
the control of a child or to protect the child or another person from physical
injury; or
(iii)  a health care decision made for a child by the child's parent or
guardian, unless, subject to Subsection 62A-4a-1004(2), the state or other
party to the proceeding shows, by clear and convincing evidence, that the
health care decision is not reasonable and informed.
(2)  "Significant risk" means a risk of harm that is determined to be
significant in accordance with risk assessment tools and rules established by
the division that focus on:
(a)  age;
(b)  social factors;
(c)  emotional factors;
(d)  sexual factors;
(e)  intellectual factors;
(f)  family risk factors; and
(g)  other related considerations.
